Maryland, session 2026, HB0068.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
13–619.5.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “OLD LINE NUMBER” MEANS A NUMERIC–ONLY VEHICLE
REGISTRATION NUMBER CONSISTING OF ONE TO FIVE DIGITS, WITHOUT LETTERS,
PUNCTUATION, OR LEADING ZEROS.
(3) “OLD LINE PLATE” MEANS A REGISTRATION PLATE ISSUED
UNDER THIS SECTION BEARING AN OLD LINE NUMBER.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0068*

HOUSE BILL 68
(4) “QUALIFYING VEHICLE” MEANS:
(I) A CLASS A (PASSENGER) VEHICLE;
(II) A CLASS E (TRUCK) VEHICLE WITH A MAXIMUM GROSS
VEHICLE WEIGHT OF 10,000 POUNDS OR LESS;
(III) A CLASS M (MULTIPURPOSE) VEHICLE; OR
(IV) ANY OTHER CLASS OF VEHICLE THAT THE ADMINISTRATION
DESIGNATES BY REGULATION.
(5) “REGISTRATION NUMBER RIGHT” MEANS A REVOCABLE,
TRANSFERABLE AUTHORIZATION ISSUED BY THE ADMINISTRATION TO HAVE A
PARTICULAR OLD LINE NUMBER ASSIGNED TO THE REGISTRATION OF A
QUALIFYING VEHICLE.
(B) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL DEVELOP AND MAKE AVAILABLE
FOR QUALIFYING VEHICLES AN OLD LINE PLATE.
(2) (I) THE STATE SHALL RETAIN OWNERSHIP OF ALL OLD LINE
PLATES.
(II) A HOLDER OF A REGISTRATION NUMBER RIGHT DOES NOT
HAVE PROPERTY INTEREST IN AN OLD LINE PLATE.
(3) AN OLD LINE PLATE SHALL RESEMBLE THE WHITE CHARACTERS
ON BLACK BACKGROUND REGISTRATION PLATE ISSUED BY THE STATE FOR DISPLAY
ON A MOTOR VEHICLE IN 1911.
(C) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL MAINTAIN AN INVENTORY OF
UNASSIGNED OLD LINE NUMBERS.
(2) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY NOT REASSIGN AN ACTIVE NUMERIC–ONLY
VEHICLE REGISTRATION NUMBER TO BE AN OLD LINE NUMBER.
(II) ON REQUEST OF A HOLDER OF AN ACTIVE NUMERIC–ONLY
VEHICLE REGISTRATION NUMBER AND PAYMENT OF THE REGISTRATION PLATE
REPLACEMENT FEE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 13–952 OF THIS TITLE, THE
ADMINISTRATION SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 68 3
1. ISSUE THE HOLDER A REGISTRATION NUMBER RIGHT;
AND
2. EXCHANGE THE INDIVIDUAL’S CURRENT
REGISTRATION PLATE WITH AN OLD LINE PLATE BEARING THE HOLDER’S CURRENT
REGISTRATION NUMBER.
(D) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL:
(I) ESTABLISH AND OPERATE A PUBLIC AUCTION PROGRAM TO
AWARD REGISTRATION NUMBER RIGHTS IN OLD LINE NUMBERS; AND
(II) ADOPT RESERVE PRICES, BID INCREMENTS, BIDDER
QUALIFICATIONS, AND OFFER NUMBER CATEGORIES.
(2) AN AUCTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE LIVE, ONLINE,
OR BY SEALED BID AND SHALL BE CONDUCTED PERIODICALLY OR ON A ROLLING
BASIS.
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (3) AND (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
ADMINISTRATION MAY TRANSFER A REGISTRATION NUMBER RIGHT AND ISSUE A
NEW, IDENTICAL OLD LINE PLATE TO ANOTHER VEHICLE REGISTRANT ON
APPLICATION AND PAYMENT OF A TRANSFER FEE DETERMINED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
REGISTRATION NUMBER RIGHT FOR AN OLD LINE NUMBER NOT ASSIGNED TO A
QUALIFYING VEHICLE FOR 12 CONSECUTIVE MONTHS SHALL REVERT TO THE
ADMINISTRATION 60 DAYS AFTER WRITTEN NOTICE IS SENT TO THE REGISTRANT’S
LAST ADDRESS ON FILE.
(II) FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY
AUTHORIZE A ONE–TIME DELAY ON REVERSION OF A REGISTRATION NUMBER RIGHT
FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS.
(3) A REGISTRATION NUMBER RIGHT MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED
WITHIN 180 DAYS AFTER ITS INITIAL ISSUANCE OR MOST RECENT TRANSFER.
(4) NOT MORE THAN ONE TRANSFER OF A SINGLE REGISTRATION
NUMBER RIGHT MAY OCCUR DURING ANY 12–MONTH PERIOD UNLESS THE
TRANSFER:
(I) IS TO OR FROM THE ESTATE OF A DECEASED HOLDER;

HOUSE BILL 68
(II) IS TO A SPOUSE, DOMESTIC PARTNER, PARENT, CHILD, OR
SIBLING OF THE HOLDER OF THE RIGHT; OR
(III) OCCURS IN CONNECTION WITH A BONA FIDE BUSINESS
REORGANIZATION IN WHICH THE BENEFICIAL OWNERSHIP OF THE ENTITY HOLDING
THE RIGHT REMAINS UNCHANGED.
(F) (1) (I) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY DENY, SUSPEND, OR REVOKE A
REGISTRATION NUMBER RIGHT FOR FRAUD OR MISUSE, NONPAYMENT OF REQUIRED
FEES, OR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION OR REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(II) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY DENY, SUSPEND, OR REVOKE A
TRANSFER UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION IF THE TRANSFER IS
DETERMINED BY THE ADMINISTRATION TO BE FOR THE PURPOSE OF EVADING
REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) UPON REVOCATION OR SURRENDER OF A REGISTRATION NUMBER
RIGHT, THE RIGHT SHALL REVERT TO THE ADMINISTRATION AND THE OLD LINE
NUMBER MAY BE RE–AUCTIONED.
(G) FEES COLLECTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE:
(1) USED TO RECOVER THE ADMINISTRATION’S COSTS UNDER THIS
SECTION; AND
(2) CREDITED TO THE TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND.
(H) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT
THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Administration shall
conduct the first auction of Old Line Numbers not later than December 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.